Washington statutes.
RCW 36.17.045

Deductions for contributions, payments, and dues authorized.

Employees of the counties shall have the right to voluntarily authorize the monthly deduction of their pledges to the United Good Neighbor or its successor, monthly payment to a credit union as defined in RCW 31.12.005, and monthly dues to a labor union, from their salaries or wages. When such written authorization is received by the county auditor, he or she shall make such monthly deduction.

[ 2009 c 337 s 1; 1963 c 164 s 3.]